Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB32.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3122. Certain limitations in first class cities.Any action, including a civil action or proceeding, initiated to collect fines, penalties, costs or fees relating to a notice of violation or citation issued under section 3116 (relating to automated red light enforcement systems in first class cities) or 6109(g) (relating to specific powers of department and local authorities) must be initiated within 10 years of the date of issuance of the notice of violation or citation.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617